Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.005

Declaration of policy.

RCW 19.52.005, 19.52.020, 19.52.030, 19.52.032, 19.52.034, and 19.52.036 are enacted in order to protect the residents of this state from debts bearing burdensome interest rates; and in order to better effect the policy of this state to use this state's policies and courts to govern the affairs of our residents and the state; and in recognition of the duty to protect our citizens from oppression generally.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 23 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 23: "If any provision of this chapter is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of the chapter and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby." [ 1967 ex.s. c 23 s 8.]

Savings—1967 ex.s. c 23: "The provisions of this 1967 amendatory act shall not apply to transactions entered into prior to the effective date hereof." [ 1967 ex.s. c 23 s 9.]